Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CORRIDORS OF COMMERCE.new text end new text begin $100,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $100,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for the corridors of commerce program under Minnesota Statutes, section 161.088. new text end